Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.111

Nonconforming installations—Disputes—Reference to board.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to install or maintain any electrical wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment not in accordance with this chapter. In cases where the interpretation and application of the installation or maintenance standards prescribed in this chapter is in dispute or in doubt, the board shall, upon application of any interested person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity, determine the methods of installation or maintenance or the materials, devices, appliances, or equipment to be used in the particular case submitted for its decision.

[ 1988 c 81 s 8; 1983 c 206 s 9; 1935 c 169 s 2; RRS s 8307-2. Formerly RCW 19.28.260.]